Tennessee, session 114, SB2129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-2003(c)(3), is amended by
adding the language ", by certified, registered, or first class mail" after the language "last known
address".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2129
010784
- 1 -